Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-229.01
Chief Water Officer; examine condition of ditches.

The Chief Water Officer shall, as often as necessary, examine into the condition of all ditches constructed or partially constructed within the state and shall compile information concerning the condition of every water appropriation and all ditches and canals and other works constructed or partially constructed thereunder.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 9, p. 836;

C.S.1922, § 8428;

C.S.1929, § 81-6309;

R.S.1943, § 46-229;

Laws 1947, c. 172, § 1(2), p. 520;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 99;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 77.